Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
§ 232.
Sales, leases, pledges, bonds, notes; hearings.

Except in connection with replacement or exchange, an individual, partnership, or unincorporated association conducting such public service business shall not make a sale or lease or series of sales or leases in any one calendar year constituting 10 percent or more of its property located within this State and actually used in or required for public service operations or mortgage or pledge any of its property or issue any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness without the consent of the Public Utility Commission, given on petition and after opportunity for hearing and a finding that the same will promote the general good of the State. Notice of such hearing shall be given as the Commission directs.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an individual, partnership, or unincorporated association may issue evidences of indebtedness payable within one year from date of issue without such consent provided such borrowing is necessary as an emergency to restore service immediately after disaster or provided its total evidences of indebtedness so payable within one year do not exceed 20 percent of its total assets. If such evidences of indebtedness in an amount which would cause its total evidences of indebtedness so payable within one year to exceed 20 percent of its total assets, then it shall give the Commission notice in writing of its intention so to do at least 10 days before the date of the proposed issue. If the Commission determines after considering the notice and the said individual, partnership, or unincorporated association’s report to the Commission that further inquiry is warranted, it shall order such individual, partnership, or unincorporated association not to issue such evidences of indebtedness under this subsection without the consent of the Commission given after opportunity for hearing, provided, however, that if the Commission does not make such an order within 10 days from the time it receives such notice under this subsection, then the individual, partnership, or unincorporated association may issue such evidences of indebtedness without the consent of the Public Utility Commission, and the Commission shall so notify such individual, partnership, or unincorporated association in writing.

Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of a common carrier by motor vehicle to issue evidences of indebtedness payable within one year from the date of issue without prior notice to or consent by the Commission.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 21

, § 9, eff. May 12, 1993.

§ 233.
Repealed. 1995, No. 99 (Adj. Sess.), § 16(1).

§ 234.
Appeal.

A person, partnership, or unincorporated association aggrieved by any act or order of the Public Utility Commission may transfer such cause to the Supreme Court under the provisions of section 12 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 235.
Heating and process fuel efficiency program.

After consultation with fuel dealers, any appointed efficiency entity, financial institutions, the Commission, representatives of the weatherization program, and other stakeholders, the Department of Public Service shall propose, develop, solicit, and monitor any combination of energy efficiency and conservation programs, measures, and compensation mechanisms to provide fuel efficiency services on a statewide basis for Vermont heating or process fuel consumers. The Department shall select one or more service providers as needed and pursuant to a competitive bidding process to implement those programs, measures, or compensation mechanisms by means of performance-based contracts that are based upon verified savings in energy usage and demand, and other performance targets. The contracts entered into during the first year after March 19, 2008 shall be for a period of time of no greater than three years. Those programs, measures, and compensation mechanisms shall include fuel efficiency services that:

produce whole building and process heat efficiency, regardless of the fuel type used;

facilitate appropriate fuel switching; and

promote coordination, to the fullest practical extent, with the electric efficiency programs established and administered pursuant to this chapter, as well as with low-income weatherization programs and any utility energy efficiency programs.

Prior to the Department of Public Service entering a contract with service providers under this section and after such notice and hearings as it may require, the Public Utility Commission shall review the programs, measures, and compensation mechanisms selected by the Department to determine whether these programs, measures, and compensation mechanisms promote the public good. The Commission may alter or impose conditions on any combination of these programs, measures, or compensation mechanisms as it deems necessary to promote the public good. If the Department thereafter changes the programs, measures, or compensation mechanisms, it shall request review under this section by the Commission prior to implementing those changes.

Funding for the program established under this section shall be provided from the Fuel Efficiency Fund established under section 203a of this title. During fiscal year 2009, any contracts or grants to be made from the Fund for other than administrative purposes shall be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly. The Department shall provide the Joint Fiscal Committee, at the Committee’s November 2008 meeting, with a preliminary report on the program to be presented to the Public Utility Commission.

The Department, subject to the oversight of the Commission, shall:

Ensure that all retail consumers, regardless of retail electricity, gas, or heating or process fuel provider, will have an opportunity to participate in and benefit from a comprehensive set of cost-effective energy efficiency programs and initiatives designed to overcome barriers to participation.

Require that continued or improved efficiencies be made in the production, delivery, and use of energy efficiency services, including the use of compensation mechanisms that are based upon verified savings in energy usage and demand, and other performance targets specified by the Commission. The linkage between compensation and verified savings in energy usage and demand (and other performance targets) shall be reviewed and adjusted not less than triennially by the Commission.

Build on the energy efficiency expertise and capabilities that have developed or may develop in the State.

Promote program initiatives and market strategies that address the needs of persons or businesses facing the most significant barriers to participation.

Promote coordinated program delivery, including coordination with low-income weatherization programs, other efficiency programs, and utility programs.

Consider innovative approaches to delivering energy efficiency, including strategies to encourage third-party financing and customer contributions to the cost of efficiency measures.

Provide a reasonably stable multiyear budget and planning cycle in order to promote program improvement, program stability, enhanced access to capital and personnel, improved integration of program designs with the budgets of regulated companies providing energy services, and maturation of programs and delivery resources.

Develop and approve programs, measures, and delivery mechanisms that reasonably reflect current and projected market conditions, technological options, and environmental benefits.

Provide for delivery of these programs as rapidly as possible, taking into consideration the need for these services, and cost-effective delivery mechanisms.

Provide for the independent evaluation of programs delivered under this section.

Require that any service provider under this section deliver programs in an effective, efficient, timely, and competent manner and meet standards that are consistent with those in section 218c of this title, the Board’s orders in Public Service Board docket 5270, and any relevant Board orders in subsequent energy efficiency proceedings.

Require verification, on or before January 1, 2011, and every three years thereafter, by an independent auditor of the reported energy and capacity savings and cost-effectiveness of programs delivered by any entity selected to be a service provider under this section.

Ensure that any energy efficiency program implemented under this section shall be reasonable and cost-effective.

Consider the impact of programs delivered under this section on the amount of fuel used, fuel prices, and fuel bills.

Ensure that the energy efficiency programs implemented under this section are designed to make continuous and proportional progress toward attaining the overall State building efficiency goals established by

10 V.S.A. § 581

, by promoting all forms of energy end-use efficiency and comprehensive sustainable building design.

Any disputes under this section shall be resolved by the Commission.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§§ 236-245.
Repealed.
1985, No. 224 (Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 246.
Temporary siting of meteorological stations.

As used in this section, a “meteorological station” consists of one temporary tower, which may include guy wires, and attached instrumentation to collect and record wind speed, wind direction, and atmospheric conditions.

The Public Utility Commission shall establish by rule or order standards and procedures governing application for, and issuance or revocation of, a certificate of public good for the temporary installation of one or more meteorological stations under the provisions of section 248 of this title. A meteorological station shall be deemed to promote the public good of the State if it is in compliance with the criteria of this section and the Commission’s rules or orders. An applicant for a certificate of public good for a meteorological station shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection 202(f) of this title.

In developing rules or orders, the Commission:

Shall develop a simple application form and shall require that the applicant first file the application with the Commission and that, within two business days of notification from the Commission that the application is complete, the applicant serve copies of the complete application on the Department of Public Service, the Agency of Natural Resources, the Agency of Transportation, and the municipality in which the meteorological station is proposed to be located.

Shall require that if no objections are filed within 30 days of the date of service of the complete application under subdivision (1) of this subsection, and the Commission determines that the applicant has met all of the requirements of section 248 of this title, the certificate of public good shall be issued for a period that the Commission finds reasonable, but in no event for more than five years. Upon request of an applicant, the Commission may renew a certificate of public good. Upon expiration of the certificate, the meteorological station and all associated structures and material shall be removed, and the site shall be restored substantially to its preconstruction condition.

May waive the requirements of section 248 of this title that are not applicable to meteorological stations, including criteria that are generally applicable to public service companies as defined in this title. The Commission shall not waive review regarding whether construction will have an undue adverse effect on aesthetics, historic sites, air and water purity, the natural environment, and the public health and safety.

Shall seek to simplify the application and review process, as appropriate, in conformance with this section.

A proposal for decision shall be issued within five months of when the Commission receives a completed application for a certificate of public good for the temporary installation of one or more meteorological stations under the provisions of section 248 of this title.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of this section, the holder of a certificate of public good for a constructed meteorological station may apply under section 248a of this title or 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 to convert the station to a wireless telecommunications facility, provided the application is filed at least 90 days before the expiration of the certificate for the station. Any such application shall constitute a new application to be reviewed under the facts and circumstances as they exist at the time of the review.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 17; amended

2011, No. 62

, § 35;

2015, No. 41

, § 13, eff. June 1, 2015;

2017, No. 53

, § 2.

Particular cases.

Based on appellant’s statements, actions, and outward manifestations of intent, including a declaration of planned community in which he stated that he might develop an electrical generation wind farm on his property, his consultations for a proposal to install a meteorological tower on the property, and his stated interest in determining what type of wind was available on the ridgeline for wind turbines, his tower was reasonably related to determining the site’s suitability for a grid-connected wind turbine, and thus met the definition of a “temporary meteorological station” and required a certificate of public good prior to its construction. In re Constr. & Operation of a Meteorological Tower, 2019 VT 20, 210 Vt. 27, 210 A.3d 1230, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 51 (2019).

To establish that a temporary meteorological tower satisfies the “reasonably related” standard and is within Public Utility Commission jurisdiction under the statute governing temporary siting of meteorological stations, an objective review of the circumstances must demonstrate that the tower was constructed or installed to help determine the site’s suitability for a grid-connected wind turbine. Such inquiries will be fact intensive and determined on a case-by-case basis. In re Constr. & Operation of a Meteorological Tower, 2019 VT 20, 210 Vt. 27, 210 A.3d 1230, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 51 (2019).

To demonstrate that a temporary meteorological tower was established to help determine a site’s suitability for a grid-connected wind turbine, the reviewer may rely on a host of factors, including—but not limited to—the station’s size and scope, the project proponent’s actions and outward manifestations of intent, the project proponent’s statements of subjective intent, the existence of plans for a grid-connected wind turbine, and subsequent development of a grid-connected project. In re Constr. & Operation of a Meteorological Tower, 2019 VT 20, 210 Vt. 27, 210 A.3d 1230, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 51 (2019).

§ 247.
Penalty.

In addition to any civil penalty imposed under section 30 and section 230 of this title, any person, partnership, unincorporated association, company, or corporation, or the officers of any unincorporated association, company, or corporation who violates section 230 or section 248 of this title shall be fined not more than $100.00 or imprisoned not more than 60 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1995, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.